Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1602
Extension work; scope.

Cooperative extension work shall consist of the giving of practical demonstrations in agriculture and home economics and imparting information on such subjects through field and home demonstrations, 4-H clubs, public meetings, publications, and otherwise. The work shall be carried on in each county under the direction of the executive board of the extension organization in the county in such manner as may be mutually agreed upon by the executive board of such county provided for in section 2-1603 and the Regents of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, through their duly appointed extension representatives.

Laws 1939, c. 1, § 2, p. 53;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-2002;

R.S.1943, § 2-1602;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 28.